Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6627XS (5) 91 da/js S.F. 2267 Section 1. Section 466B.2, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. âDivisionâ means the division of soil 3 conservation and water quality created within the department of 4 agriculture and land stewardship pursuant to section 159.5. 5 Sec. 2. Section 466B.3, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 6 2026, is amended to read as follows: 7 b. The director of the division of soil conservation and 8 water quality within the department of agriculture and land 9 stewardship or the directorâs designee. 10 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 466B.12 Benchmark reporting. 11 In administering any project or program supported by 12 state moneys that monitors surface water for the purpose of 13 establishing benchmarks to determine progress in meeting a 14 clean water goal or objective, the department of natural 15 resources or the division, whichever administers the program 16 or project, shall publish and regularly update a benchmark 17 status report on an internet site administered jointly by 18 the department of natural resources and the division. The 19 project or program may be established or created in this 20 chapter, or another chapter, if it authorizes the department 21 of natural resources or the division to monitor surface 22 water for purposes of acquiring data relating to nutrient 23 loads, precipitation-induced surface runoff, or storm water 24 discharges. The report shall include measurements taken before 25 a project or program begins, during the period when the project 26 or program is ongoing, and after the project or program is 27 completed. 28 Sec. 4. Section 466B.41, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 29 by striking the subsection. 30